Hawaii statutes.
[§346D-7] Rules. The department
of human services shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91, for the
purpose of this chapter. [L 1983, c 192, §9; am L 1985, c 207, pt of §1; am L
1987, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 208, pt of §3]

Revision Note

"Chapter" substituted for "Act" pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next